District of Columbia statutes.
47-2906

Repealed

Penalty for failure to post price scale.

Repealed.

Leg. Assem., June 20, 1872, § 2
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 484, 32 DCR 4450
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 11(c), 50 DCR 10996
1981 Ed., § 47-2906.
1973 Ed., § 47-2906.